Arkansas, session 2025, SB479.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-5-310(b)(2)(B), concerning who may assist
voters with disabilities at the polling machine, is amended to read as
follows:
(B) A person named by the voter who:
(i) Is present in the polling site;
(ii) 1s eighteen (18) years of age or older; and
(iii) Presents a document or identification card
that meets the requirements established by the State Board of Election
Commissioners.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-5-310(b)(5), concerning assisting voters
with disabilities, is amended to read as follows:
(5)(A) It shall be the duty of the poll workers at the polling
site to make and maintain a list of the names and addresses of all persons
*SSS235*
03/14/2025 12:17:58 PM SSS235

SB479
assisting voters.
(B) The list shall contain the name of the assistor as it
appears on the document or identification card presented by the assistor
under subdivision (b)(2)(B)(iii) of this section.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 7-5-310, concerning assisting voters
with disabilities, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as
follows:
(d) The State Board of Election Commissioners shall promulgate rules
concerning the required documents or identification necessary to assist a
voter with a disability under subdivision (b)(2)(B)(iii) of this section.

























03/14/2025 12:17:58 PM SSS235